New Jersey, session 222, A2248.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Department of Human Services and Department of Health shall jointly conduct a study on the projected impact of federal cuts to the Medicaid program pursuant to United States H.R.1 (Pub.L.119-21), across different Medicaid services, populations, and direct service providers in the State.  At a minimum, the study shall include an analysis on the effects and implications of funding cuts to the Medicaid program on:  hospitals, long-term care facilities, transportation providers, and direct service providers in the State; Medicaid eligibility for residents of the State; and State and local budgets. b.  Within 90 days following the effective date of this act, the Commissioners of Human Services and Health shall jointly prepare and submit a report to the Governor and to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), which report shall contain a summary of the findings of the study conducted pursuant to subsection a. of this section and any recommendations for legislative or regulatory action for the continued provision of services under the Medicaid program, including recommendations on how to prioritize resources under the program.  The report shall be made publicly available on the Department of Human Services and the Department of Health's Internet websites. c.  As used in this section, "Medicaid" means the Medicaid program established pursuant to P.L.1968, c.413 (C.30:4D-1 et seq.) and the NJ FamilyCare Program established pursuant to P.L.2005, c.156 (C.30:4J-8 et  al.). 2.  This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire upon submission of the report required pursuant to subsection b. of section 1 of this act.